Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.130

When remuneration for referral not allowed.

In accordance with RCW 74.09.240, the agency may not solicit or receive any remuneration directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in return for referring an individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for which payment may be made in whole or in part under chapter 74.09 RCW.

[ 2011 c 357 s 14.]